Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-2004.12
Back the Blue Cash Fund; grants.

(1) For purposes of this section:

(a) Eligible purpose means:

(i) Providing support to any:

(A) Injured law enforcement personnel;

(B) Spouse of any injured or deceased law enforcement personnel; or

(C) Child of any injured or deceased law enforcement personnel if such child is under the age of nineteen years old; or

(ii) Conducting any charitable activity that supports the residents of this state; and

(b) Qualified applicant means any association that represents personnel of any law enforcement agency in this state.

(2) A qualified applicant may apply to the Nebraska State Patrol for a grant under this section. The Nebraska State Patrol shall prescribe the form for the application.

(3) The Nebraska State Patrol may award a grant to any qualified applicant who applies under this section for an eligible purpose.

(4) The State of Nebraska shall not require or request any recipient of a grant awarded under this section to reimburse any money received from such grant.

(5) No later than January 1, 2027, the Nebraska State Patrol shall prescribe the form for grant applications under this section.

(6) The Nebraska State Patrol may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out this section.

Laws 2026, LB972, § 81.
July 18, 2026